Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.250

Unlicensed persons.

(1) If the director has reason to believe that a person has violated or is violating RCW 19.230.030 or 19.230.080, the director or the director's designee may conduct an examination or investigation as authorized under RCW 19.230.130.

(2) If as a result of such investigation or examination, the director finds that a person has violated RCW 19.230.030 or 19.230.080, the director may issue a temporary cease and desist order as authorized under RCW 19.230.260.

(3) If as a result of such an investigation or examination, the director finds that a person has violated RCW 19.230.030 or 19.230.080, the director may issue an order to prohibit the person from continuing to engage in providing money services, to compel the person to pay restitution to damaged parties, to impose civil money penalties on the person, which may include the costs and expenses to investigate and prosecute violations of this chapter, and to prohibit from participation in the affairs of any licensee or authorized delegate, or both, any executive officer, person in control, or employee of the person.

(4) The director may petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order under the rules of civil procedure.

[ 2017 c 30 s 18; 2003 c 287 s 27.]